Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1340
Board; accept property and services.

The board may accept gifts, donations, money, and services to carry out the Ethanol Development Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-1316;

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB815, § 11.
July 18, 2026